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DTC

B1188/56 Short in P Squib (2nd step) Circuit

(to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib (2nd step) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger airbag assem-

bly.

It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.
DTC B1188/56 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P squib (2nd step) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
«Short in P squib (2nd step) circuit (to B+) * Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib (2nd step))
B1188/56 * P squib (2nd step) malfunction * Airbag sensor assembly
* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction *Dash wire
HINT:

DTC B1188/56 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stage airbag).

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-742.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).
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2 [ Check dash wire (P squib (2nd step) circuit).
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PREPARATION:

Connectthe negative (

at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turntheignition switchto ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and P2+
ofthe dash wire connector onthe front passengerairbag
assembly (P squib (2nd step)) side.

-)terminal cable to the battery, and wait

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

Repair or replace dash wire.

e )




DIAGNOSTICS -

DI-755
SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect P2+ and P2- of the dash
wire connector on the front passenger airbag assembly (P
squib (2nd step)) side.

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTCB 1188/56is not output.

HINT:

CodesotherthancodeB 1188/56 may be outputatthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check P squib (2nd step).
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the front passenger airbag assembly (P squib
(2nd step)) to the dash wire.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:

DTCB 1188/56is not output.
HINT:
CodesotherthancodeB 1188/56 may be outputatthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

(P squib (2nd step)).

NG> Replace front passenger airbag assembly

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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